Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.160

Blind or visually impaired voter accessibility.

(1) At each voting center, at least one voting unit certified by the secretary of state shall provide access to individuals who are blind or visually impaired.

(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Accessible" includes receiving, using, selecting, and manipulating voter data and controls.

(b) "Nonvisual" includes synthesized speech, Braille, and other output methods.

(c) "Blind and visually impaired" excludes persons who are both deaf and blind.

[ 2011 c 10 s 25; 2004 c 267 s 701; 2004 c 266 s 3. Prior: 2003 c 110 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.33.305.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.